Tennessee statutes. Title 21 Proceedings In Chancery
Part 2

Process

21-1-201. Copy of bill on demand.

The clerk shall issue, upon demand, to any one of the defendants, the defendant's agent or attorney, to whom no copy of the bill appears by the sheriff's return to have been delivered, a certified copy of the bill, to be charged in the bill of costs.

Code 1858, § 4344 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 122, § 1); Acts 1877, ch. 45, § 2; Shan., § 6154; Code 1932, § 10425; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-206.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 129.

Law Reviews.

An Exegesis of the Ejectment Statutes of Tennessee (R.D. Cox), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 581 (1988).

Collateral References. Equity
119-126.

21-1-202. Names included in process.

Attachments, injunctions and all other process issued to any one (1) county shall embrace the names of all the defendants required to be served with the process residing in that county.

Code 1858, § 4345 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 122, § 3); Shan., § 6155; Code 1932, § 10426; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-207.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 47.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Criminal Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 319.

Collateral References. Equity
119-126.

21-1-203. Personal service dispensed with.

Personal service of process on the defendant in a court of chancery is dispensed with in the following cases:

When the defendant is a nonresident of this state;

When, upon inquiry at the defendant's usual place of abode, the defendant cannot be found so as to be served with process, and there is just ground to believe that the defendant is gone beyond the limits of the state;

When the sheriff makes return upon any leading process that the defendant is not to be found;

When the name of the defendant is unknown and cannot be ascertained upon diligent inquiry;

When the residence of the defendant is unknown and cannot be ascertained upon diligent inquiry;

When judicial and other attachments will lie, under this code, against the property of the defendant; and

When a domestic corporation has ceased to do business and has no known officers, directors, trustees or other legal representatives on whom personal service may be had.

To dispense with process in any of the cases listed in subsection (a), the facts shall be stated under oath in the bill, or by separate affidavit, or appear by the return.

Code, 1858, §§ 4352, 4353 (deriv. Acts 1787, ch. 22, § 1; 1801, ch. 6, § 14; 1833, ch. 15, § 1; 1833, ch. 47, § 3; 1835-1836, ch. 43, § 5; 1855-1856, ch. 164, § 2); Acts 1915, ch. 42; Shan., §§ 6162, 6163; Code 1932, §§ 10431, 10432; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-212; modified.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 10 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 52, 116, 136, 137, 443.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 1-4-4 — 1-4-6.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, § 80; 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 47; 20 Tenn. Juris., Newspapers, § 3; 21 Tenn. Juris., Process, § 10.

Law Reviews.

Broadening The Bases of Individual In Personam Jurisdiction in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 237.

Cited: Finch v. Frymire, 36 S.W. 883, 1896 Tenn. Ch. App. LEXIS 13 (1896); Rast v. Terry, 532 S.W.2d 552, 1976 Tenn. LEXIS 607 (Tenn. 1976); Marlowe v. Kingdom Hall of Jehovah's Witnesses, 541 S.W.2d 121, 1976 Tenn. LEXIS 532 (Tenn. 1976); Dungan v. Dungan, 579 S.W.2d 183, 1979 Tenn. LEXIS 424 (Tenn. 1979); Hamm v. Hamm, 614 S.W.2d 366, 1980 Tenn. App. LEXIS 421 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1980); Watson v. Waters, 694 S.W.2d 524, 1984 Tenn. App. LEXIS 3192 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1984); Morrow v. Bobbitt, 943 S.W.2d 384, 1996 Tenn. App. LEXIS 489 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1996); Lipscomb v. Doe, 32 S.W.3d 840, 2000 Tenn. LEXIS 663 (Tenn. 2000); Perry v. Unknown Parties, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 797 (Tenn. Ct. App. Dec. 28, 2010).

1. Constitutionality.
2. Purpose.
3. Strict Construction.
4. —Unknown Parties.
5. —Grounds for Publication.
6. Chancery Jurisdiction — Scope.
7. Judgment Against Nonresident.
8. —“Nonresident” Defined.
9. —Personal Judgment.
10. —Property Impounded.
11. —Attaching Interest of Nonresident Partner.
12. —Vendor's Lien — Enforcement Against Nonresident.
13. —Quieting Title Against Nonresident.
14. —Reformation of Deed.
15. —Tax Sale.
16. Inability to Find Defendant.
17. —Affidavit.
18. —Premature Return of Inability to Find.
19. Corporation.
20. —Having No Officers or Agents.
21. —Utility District.
22. Residence of Defendant Unknown.
23. Non Compos Mentis — Process Necessary.
24. Return to Rule Days — Application of Rule.
25. Questioning Validity of Notice.
26. Defense After Pro Confesso.
27. Persons Not in Being.
28. Diligent Inquiry.
29. Constructive Service Insufficient.

It is within the powers of a state to provide by statute for bringing into its courts nonresidents having interests in real property situated within the state for the purpose of enforcing a lien, or clearing a title, or subjecting the property to the satisfaction of debts and that jurisdiction in such cases may be obtained by publication of notice to such nonresidents. Connor v. Tennessee C. R. Co., 109 F. 931, 1901 U.S. App. LEXIS 4260 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1901).

Originally, courts of chancery acted only in personam. Instance after instance arose where it was seen to be necessary that in order to do complete justice this rule should be relaxed. As a result the legislature passed this section. Bradley v. Rock Gardens Utility Dist., 186 Tenn. 665, 212 S.W.2d 657, 1948 Tenn. LEXIS 596 (1948).

Originally courts of chancery acted only in personam, and the rule is only changed by statute, which must be strictly construed. Grace v. Hunt, 3 Tenn. 341, 1 Cooke 341, 1813 Tenn. LEXIS 27 (1813); Grewar v. Henderson, 1 Cooper's Tenn. Ch. 76 (1872).

The right conferred by subdivision (a)(7) of this section being statutory, it must be strictly construed. Bradley v. Rock Gardens Utility Dist., 186 Tenn. 665, 212 S.W.2d 657, 1948 Tenn. LEXIS 596 (1948).

Proceedings against unknown parties are invalid upon publication alone, which does not strictly comply with statutory requirements. Bleidorn v. Pilot Mountain Coal & Mining Co., 89 Tenn. 166, 15 S.W. 737, 1890 Tenn. LEXIS 36 (1890).

This section provides for two classes of cases without discriminating between them. The one class requires the fact on which the publication is grounded to appear on the face of the bill, or by affidavit attached; and in the other class, the fact upon which publication is grounded must appear by the officer's return. If the bill is false, the proceedings are fraudulent and void, and the complainant must suffer the consequences; but if the officer's return be false, the proceedings are not thereby invalidated, and the remedy of the defendant is against the officer alone, unless there be collusion between the officer and the complainant. Grewar v. Henderson, 1 Cooper's Tenn. Ch. 76 (1872).

Chancery is not confined in the exercise of its jurisdiction to decrees in personam. Robert v. Frogge, 149 Tenn. 181, 258 S.W. 782, 1923 Tenn. LEXIS 91 (1924).

Personal service of process on a nonresident defendant is dispensed with by statute, in chancery cases. Anderson v. Stribling, 160 Tenn. 453, 26 S.W.2d 131, 1929 Tenn. LEXIS 121 (1930).

The court cannot acquire jurisdiction by constructive or substituted service of process to render personal judgment against a nonresident defendant who does not appear; the rule is otherwise with respect to resident defendants. Frolich & Barbour v. Hanson, 155 Tenn. 601, 296 S.W. 353, 1926 Tenn. LEXIS 85 (1927).

The courts of this state have full authority to proceed against a nonresident upon seizure of his property within the state and publication, and such nonresident may be bound in such proceeding so far as his property in the state is concerned, but no further. Anderson v. Stribling, 160 Tenn. 453, 26 S.W.2d 131, 1929 Tenn. LEXIS 121 (1930).

A personal judgment may not be rendered against a nonresident defendant of whom jurisdiction is acquired only by publication notice. Lawson v. American Laundry Machinery Co., 165 Tenn. 180, 54 S.W.2d 712, 1932 Tenn. LEXIS 35 (1932).

A personal judgment may not be rendered against a nonresident defendant against whom jurisdiction is acquired only by publication. Turnblazer v. Smith, 214 Tenn. 277, 379 S.W.2d 772, 1964 Tenn. LEXIS 475 (1964).

By way of dicta it was said that the word “nonresident” may include domiciliaries sojourning or residing elsewhere. Saul v. Saul, 122 F.2d 64, 1941 U.S. App. LEXIS 2907 (D.C. Cir. 1941).

And, further if the statute should be so construed, the notice published pursuant to it would not be wanting in due process. Saul v. Saul, 122 F.2d 64, 1941 U.S. App. LEXIS 2907 (D.C. Cir. 1941).

No personal judgment can be rendered against a nonresident served with notice only by publication. Perry v. Young, 133 Tenn. 522, 182 S.W. 577, 1915 Tenn. LEXIS 116, L.R.A. (n.s.) 1917B385 (1916).

Courts of law cannot entertain suit against a nonresident for a personal demand, upon publication alone, without attachment or other impoundment of property situated within the jurisdiction of the court; and want of jurisdiction over the nonresident is not, in such case, cured by the fact that a codefendant, jointly sued, but severally liable for the demand, was duly served with process. Farmers' & Traders' Bank of Allen County, 88 Tenn. 279, 12 S.W. 545, 1889 Tenn. LEXIS 48 (1889).

In a suit in chancery by minority certificate holders in a resident incorporated fraternal beneficiary association against it and a nonresident similar association to declare illegal and ultra vires an attempted merger of the two associations, to restrain the disposition of the assets of the resident association under such void contract, and to require the return to the nonresident association of its assets illegally and wrongfully received by the resident association and its officers, jurisdiction of the nonresident association may be obtained by substituted process and constructive service by publication, where jurisdiction of the resident association has been obtained by personal service of process, appearance, and answer, and the jurisdiction of the subject matter, as the property of the corporations, has been obtained by impoundment by injunction, by which the court acquires jurisdiction to determine the entire controversy. Knapp v. Supreme Commandery, U. O. G. C. W., 121 Tenn. 212, 118 S.W. 390, 1908 Tenn. LEXIS 17 (1908).

Where interest of a partner in assets of a nonresident partnership is attached, other partners may be brought in by publication in order to ascertain the rights of the partners. Gaines v. Fourth Nat'l Bank, 52 S.W. 467, 1898 Tenn. Ch. App. LEXIS 158 (1898).

As attachment of land is not necessary to enforce a vendor's lien thereon, the court acquires jurisdiction by publication against a nonresident defendant, conforming to the requirements of this section, without complying with the requirements of § 29-6-145. Kyle v. Philips, 65 Tenn. 43, 1873 Tenn. LEXIS 296 (1873); Kemper-Thomas Paper Co. v. Shyer, 108 Tenn. 444, 67 S.W. 856, 1901 Tenn. LEXIS 46 (1902).

In suit to quiet title and to have rights declared, subdivision (a)(1) applies. Ray v. Haag, 1 Tenn. Ch. App. 249 (1901).

Where in a suit to reform a deed the court had jurisdiction of the subject matter and three of the defendants named in such suit resided in the county where the suit was brought and the other nonresident defendants were served by publication of the decree of the court allowing such reformation was immune from collateral attack. Globe & Republic Ins. Co. v. Shields, 170 Tenn. 485, 96 S.W.2d 947, 1936 Tenn. LEXIS 20 (1936).

Publication of notice in city newspaper of proceeding by city to sell land of nonresident for nonpayment of city taxes was constructive notice and binding on nonresident, since nonresident was not entitled to actual notice of accrual of city taxes on property and of proceeding to sell property for unpaid taxes, even though property had formerly been outside of city limits and was later taken in by city on extension of city limits. Moore v. Memphis, 184 Tenn. 92, 195 S.W.2d 623, 1946 Tenn. LEXIS 264 (1946).

Tax sale was void where jurisdiction over defendant was supposedly acquired by publication based on a not to be found return, but record showed that no return had in fact been made. Naylor v. Billington, 213 Tenn. 614, 378 S.W.2d 737, 1964 Tenn. LEXIS 429 (1964).

The return of the sheriff “not to be found” is a legal prerequisite to a publication upon that ground and without such return any decree returned by the chancery court is void to such party. Naylor v. Billington, 213 Tenn. 614, 378 S.W.2d 737, 1964 Tenn. LEXIS 429 (1964).

A “reasonableness” standard is codified in the requirement of diligent inquiry; taxing authorities are not required to undertake extraordinary efforts to discover the identity and whereabouts of an interested party. Freeman v. City of Kingsport, 926 S.W.2d 247, 1996 Tenn. App. LEXIS 24 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1996).

An order of pro confesso cannot be sustained where the order of publication was based upon an affidavit filed that the defendant was not to be found, because the statute requires that the order of publication should be based upon the officer's return. Grewar v. Henderson, 1 Cooper's Tenn. Ch. 76 (1872).

The sheriff's return on the process of “not to be found in my county,” if premature, as where the process was not retained by the sheriff until the return day, would not authorize the publication. McGavock v. Young, 3 Cooper's Tenn. Ch. 529 (1877); Davis v. Reaves, 75 Tenn. 585, 1881 Tenn. LEXIS 155 (1881).

Except to send a letter to encourage the property owner to receive process in person, the county did not attempt to give actual notice of the tax lien suit before it sold the land; notice did not comply with T.C.A. §§ 21-1-203 and 67-5-2415 as the county did not exercise due diligence before returning the summonses not found and it did not comply with due process. Wilson v. Blount County, 207 S.W.3d 741, 2006 Tenn. LEXIS 993 (Tenn. 2006).

Subdivision (a)(7) of this section does not authorize service by publication upon a public corporation when the corporation has no officers or agents, and has never had any, and no one is named in the act creating the corporation upon whom service may be had. Bradley v. Rock Gardens Utility Dist., 186 Tenn. 665, 212 S.W.2d 657, 1948 Tenn. LEXIS 596 (1948).

Attempted service on defendant utility district created by private act by means of service on secretary of state and by publication in a proceeding for a declaratory judgment that private act was unconstitutional was invalid where no commissioner or officer for utility district existed. Bradley v. Rock Gardens Utility Dist., 186 Tenn. 665, 212 S.W.2d 657, 1948 Tenn. LEXIS 596 (1948).

In a divorce suit against defendant whose residence is unknown, a recital in the bill and in the decree that the defendant is a nonresident will not give the court jurisdiction of the defendant. In a suit against a defendant whose residence is unknown, the complainant must state on oath, either in his bill or in an affidavit, and must prove that the residence of the defendant is unknown and that it cannot be ascertained after proper and diligent inquiry. A divorce decree rendered without actual or constructive notice is void; and if constructive notice be relied on, the statutes providing for the same must be strictly observed. Gallagher v. Knoxville Iron Co., 5 Tenn. Civ. App. (5 Higgins) 718 (1914).

Service of process upon a non compos mentis defendant is not dispensed with by statute, and service is necessary to confer jurisdiction. Smith v. Smith, 159 Tenn. 36, 15 S.W.2d 747, 1928 Tenn. LEXIS 59 (1929).

Where process was not served upon person later declared to be of unsound mind judgment was invalid regardless of appearance of guardian ad litem. In re McCartney, 31 Tenn. App. 171, 213 S.W.2d 25, 1948 Tenn. App. LEXIS 81 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1948).

A rule of court, making “any process” other than final process returnable to rule days, includes not only the process provided for in this section, but all process except that which is final. Fellows v. Cook, 57 Tenn. 81, 1872 Tenn. LEXIS 401 (1872).

Where a husband had actively aided wife in procuring a divorce in Tennessee from her former husband and had advised her not to correct an allegation in her complaint that her former husband probably claimed his legal residence in Massachusetts, the husband could not, in order to annul his own marriage, question the validity of the notice given to the former husband in the divorce proceeding on either the ground of fraud or lack of due process, particularly where the former husband had not questioned the notice or the divorce. Saul v. Saul, 122 F.2d 64, 1941 U.S. App. LEXIS 2907 (D.C. Cir. 1941).

In order to entitle the defendants to appear and defend after judgment pro confesso, they must all show merits, except in the cases of nonresidents and those whose residences are unknown. Owens v. Sims, 43 Tenn. 544, 1866 Tenn. LEXIS 85 (1866).

Where complainant held life estate in real property with remainder to her unborn child or children in fee, valid service by publication could not be had on such unborn child or children under provisions of this section in action by life tenant against such unborn child or children for permission to sell property and invest proceeds or to mortgage property for improvements or to have title vested in life tenant in fee. Rodgers v. Unborn Child or Children of Rodgers, 204 Tenn. 96, 315 S.W.2d 521, 1958 Tenn. LEXIS 249 (1958).

In the brothers' suit to void the tax sale regarding their previously jointly-owned inherited property, a directed verdict in favor of the new owners was proper as the process server used due diligence in attempting to serve the brothers with notice of the tax suit pursuant to T.C.A. § 21-1-203(a)(3), and there was no violation of the brothers' due process rights, because of the deputy's actions or the constructive notice provided by the county after personal service on the brothers was unsuccessful. Smith v. Gregory, 253 S.W.3d 175, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 676 (Tenn. Ct. App. Nov. 6, 2007), appeal denied, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. LEXIS 292 (Tenn. Apr. 14, 2008).

In a termination of parental rights proceeding, given the absence of information regarding steps taken to identify the father, an adoption agency did not carry its burden of demonstrating the diligent inquiry required by T.C.A. § 21-1-203(a) in order to use service by publication, as simply asking the birth mother if she knew the name of the father and then giving up was not sufficient; the location of the party, the name of the host of the party, the names of attendees of the party, and the type of vehicle in which the child was conceived were all obvious areas of inquiry. Adoption Place, Inc. v. Doe, 273 S.W.3d 142, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 750 (Tenn. Ct. App. Dec. 5, 2007), appeal denied, The Adoption Place, Inc. v. Doe, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. LEXIS 90 (Tenn. Feb. 4, 2008).

Default judgment terminating a mother's parental rights was void because the father failed to make diligent efforts to locate the mother to accomplish personal service and failed to seek a court order allowing him to serve the mother by publication; the only efforts the father took to locate the mother were sending service of process to a home in which he knew the mother no longer resided and consulting with counsel. Turner v. Turner, — S.W.3d —, 2014 Tenn. App. LEXIS 398 (Tenn. Ct. App. July 7, 2014), aff'd in part, rev'd in part, 473 S.W.3d 257, 2015 Tenn. LEXIS 831 (Tenn. Oct. 21, 2015).

Tennessee statutes authorize dispensing with personal service of process in a proceeding to terminate parental rights only if the defendant's residence is unknown and cannot be ascertained upon diligent inquiry, and the plaintiff has asked for an order authorizing constructive service by publication and has supported the request with an affidavit, and only when the residence of the defendant cannot be obtained through diligent inquiry may a party resort to constructive service by publication. Turner v. Turner, 473 S.W.3d 257, 2015 Tenn. LEXIS 831 (Tenn. Oct. 21, 2015).

Record contained neither a motion from the father requesting an order authorizing constructive service by publication nor an affidavit describing the diligent inquiries that were made to locate the mother's whereabouts or her residence, and there was no order from the trial court authorizing constructive service by publication; the father's failure to comply with the statutory requirements necessary for resorting to constructive service by publication deprived the trial court of personal jurisdiction over the mother, and the judgment terminating the mother's parental rights was void. Turner v. Turner, 473 S.W.3d 257, 2015 Tenn. LEXIS 831 (Tenn. Oct. 21, 2015).

Even if plaintiff were allowed to utilize the statutes in this breach of contract case, the constructive service by publication attempted by plaintiff was insufficient, given that defendant made his home outside the area of normal circulation of the paper plaintiff chose, and thus the publication was not reasonably calculated to give defendant notice of the suit. Ebulueme v. Onoh, — S.W.3d —, 2019 Tenn. App. LEXIS 260 (Tenn. Ct. App. May 24, 2019).

Collateral References.

Application of doctrine of idem sonans or the like to substituted or constructive service of process. 45 A.L.R.2d 1090.

Difference between date of affidavit for service by publication and date of filing or of order for publication as affecting validity of service. 46 A.L.R.2d 1364.

Jurisdiction to render judgment for arrearage of alimony without personal service upon defendant of whom court had jurisdiction in the original divorce suit. 168 A.L.R. 232.

Power to grant annulment of marriage against nonresident on constructive service. 43 A.L.R.2d 1086.

Sufficiency of affidavit made by attorney or other person on behalf of plaintiff for purpose of service by publication. 47 A.L.R.2d 423.

Equity
322.

The order for publication in lieu of personal service may be made at any time after the filing of the bill. The order of publication should contain the names of the parties, the style of the court in which the proceedings are had and the name of the place where the court is held, without any brief or abstract of facts, unless directed by the court.

When the suit is against an unknown defendant, the order of publication should describe the unknown party, as near as may be, by the character in which the unknown party is sued, and by reference to the unknown party's title or interest in the subject matter of the litigation.

Evidence of the publication in pursuance of the order may be by affidavit of the printer or actual production of the newspaper in court.

21-1-204. Service by publication.

In case personal service is not used, if the defendant does not cause an appearance to be entered, the clerk, as soon as the necessary affidavit is made, shall enter upon the rule docket an order requiring the defendant to appear at a certain day named in the order, being a rule day, and defend, or otherwise the bill will be taken for confessed.

The clerk shall forthwith cause a copy of this order to be published for four (4) consecutive weeks in the newspaper mentioned in the order or designated by the general rules of the court.

Code 1858, §§ 4354-4359 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 4; 1833, ch. 15; 1845-1846, ch. 122, § 7; 1851-1852, ch. 365, § 3; 1853-1854, ch. 55, § 3; 1855-1856, ch. 164, § 2); Shan., §§ 6164-6169; Code 1932, §§ 10433-10438; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 21-213 — 21-217; modified.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 10 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 116, 138, 139.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-4-4.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Appearances, § 7; Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, §§ 80, 83, 111; 21 Tenn. Juris., Process, §§ 10, 11.

Law Reviews.

A Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, II. Selecting a Proper Forum (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 273.

Federal and State Condemnation Proceedings — Procedure and Statutory Background (William E. Miller), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1085.

Recent Developments — Domestic Relations — Divorce — Due Process for Indigent Plaintiffs, 47 Tenn. L. Rev. 845.

Cited: Rast v. Terry, 532 S.W.2d 552, 1976 Tenn. LEXIS 607 (Tenn. 1976); Dungan v. Dungan, 579 S.W.2d 183, 1979 Tenn. LEXIS 424 (Tenn. 1979); In re F.M.B.P.W., — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 176 (Tenn. Ct. App. Mar. 26, 2008); Perry v. Unknown Parties, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 797 (Tenn. Ct. App. Dec. 28, 2010).

21-1-205. Actual notice to nonresidents.

Where publication is made for a nonresident defendant, the clerk of the court in which the suit is filed shall mail a copy of the complaint or, after the first publication, mail a copy of the newspaper clipping containing the publication to the nonresident defendant, directed to the nonresident defendant's last known address; and the clerk shall make an entry upon the clerk's docket so showing. The clerk shall mail the copy of the complaint or published notice by return receipt certified or registered mail. The return of the receipt signed by the defendant or the defendant's duly authorized agent, or its return marked refused, evidenced by appropriate notation of that fact by the postal authorities, and filed as a part of the record by the clerk, with notation on the docket of the true facts, shall be evidence of personal notice. In the event the return receipt does not establish that it was signed by the defendant or the defendant's authorized agent or that the notice was refused, then the court may find through independent proof that the defendant had actual notice in compliance with notice requirements. If the court does not find that the defendant had actual notice, it may order new publication on applicable grounds, or order such other and further action to be taken to give the defendant notice.

In those counties where the divorce referee mails notice of the filing of the divorce and a copy of the complaint to a nonresident defendant by certified or registered mail return receipt requested, it shall not be necessary for the clerk of the court to also mail notice. Notice to the nonresident defendant from the divorce referee shall be sufficient, subject to the requirements of evidence of notice as set forth in subsection (a); provided, that the return receipt is filed as part of the record, with notation on the docket of the true facts. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to have changed or amended requirements of the law as to venue or jurisdiction.

Acts 1923, ch. 13, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 5284a1; mod. Code 1932, §§ 10439, 10440; Acts 1977, ch. 74, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-218.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 138, 147, 515.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-4-4.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 27.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, IV. Divorce (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 433.

A Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, II. Selecting a Proper Forum (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 273.

Recent Developments — Domestic Relations — Divorce — Due Process for Indigent Plaintiffs, 47 Tenn. L. Rev. 845.

Cited: Baggett v. Baggett, 541 S.W.2d 407, 1976 Tenn. LEXIS 548 (Tenn. 1976); Hamm v. Hamm, 614 S.W.2d 366, 1980 Tenn. App. LEXIS 421 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1980).

21-1-206. Memorandum book for process.

The clerk shall keep a memorandum book in which shall be noted the issuance of every subpoena for witnesses, commissions, with the day of issuance, and any other proceedings of the clerk if not entered on the clerk's records, rule docket, or minutes; and the book shall be open for parties or their attorneys to make such memorandums for the direction of the clerk as may be necessary.

Code 1858, § 4433 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 46); Shan., § 6245; Code 1932, § 10530; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-219.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 642.